Mississippi, session 2026, HB890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is established the Downtown Jackson Revitalization Coalition for the purpose of bringing together stakeholders on the national, state and local levels for the development of a comprehensive plan to revitalize downtown Jackson, the capital city of the State of Mississippi. (2)  The coalition is composed of the following twenty-one (21) members or their respective designees: (a)  The United States Department of Agriculture State Director for Mississippi; (b)  The Interim Third Party Manager appointed by the United States District Court for the Southern District of Mississippi to oversee the city's water and sewer systems; (c)  United States Senator Roger Wicker; (d)  United States Senator Cindy Hyde-Smith; (e)  Congressman Bennie Thompson, United States Representative of Mississippi's 2nd Congressional District; (f)  The Mississippi Governor; (g)  The Mississippi Lieutenant Governor; (h)  The Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives; (i)  The Director of the Mississippi Development Authority; (j)  The Chief of the Capitol Police; (k)  The Mayor of the City of Jackson; (l)  The Executive Director of the Hinds County Economic Development Authority; (m)  The President of the Greater Jackson Alliance; (n)  The Executive Director of the Jackson Redevelopment Authority; (o)  The President of Visit Jackson; (p)  The Director of the Capitol Complex Improvement District; (q)  The President of Downtown Jackson Partners; (r)  The Executive Director of Great City Mississippi Foundation; (s)  The President of Farish Street Community of Shalom; (t)  The President of Jackson State University; and (u)  The Chief of the Jackson Police Department. A member of the coalition named in this subsection may designate an individual from the staff of the member's office, agency or organization to serve in place of that member on the coalition. (3)  The Lieutenant Governor shall set the date and location for an organizational meeting of the coalition, which must be held before July 1, 2026.  Notice of the organizational meeting and subsequent meetings must be provided no less than three (3) weeks before the date on which the meeting is scheduled.  At the organizational meeting, the coalition shall determine those officers deemed necessary for the coalition's operation and shall elect from among the membership persons to serve as the officers.  Meetings of the coalition must be held on a monthly basis.  The coalition shall establish its goals and objectives for each meeting, which may include informational sessions by interested stakeholders and tours to various sites pertinent to the work of the coalition within the City of Jackson.  All actions of the coalition must be decided by a majority vote of the members of the coalition present and voting at the meeting at which an action is being considered. (4)  Members of the coalition shall serve without compensation.  However, those members of the coalition employed by a state or local government agency may be reimbursed for mileage and actual and necessary expenses as authorized under Section 25-3-41. (5)  The coalition may accept gifts, donations and grants of any kind from any source, public or private, to help defray any expenses incurred by the coalition. (6)  Whenever feasible, members of the coalition shall make available such professional and administrative staff as may be necessary to assist the coalition in the performance of its duties. (7)  Before December 15, 2026, the coalition shall submit a report of its determinations and recommended actions to the Governor, the Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, each member of the Legislature who represents a district in the City of Jackson, and any other member of the Legislature upon request.  The report must include, but need not be limited to, the following: (a)  An inventory of existing resources that are aimed at making improvements in the City of Jackson and how those resources may be utilized and supported in furtherance of their goals; (b)  A description of the activities of the coalition; (c)  Recommendations for a cohesive plan of action to bring community stakeholders together to implement measures aimed at revitalizing downtown Jackson and spurring economic development, reducing crime and making improvements to the city's infrastructure; and (d)  Any other recommendations determined by the coalition to be necessary and desirable to further the goal of revitalizing the City of Jackson. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.